Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.115

Liability of federal, state, and local agencies, and employees—Facilitation of access of first informer broadcaster.

Federal, state, and local agencies, and their employees, are not liable for any action, or failure to act, when facilitating access of a first informer broadcaster to an area affected by an emergency or disaster.

[ 2019 c 207 s 3.]